Arkansas, session 2025, SB389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-2-205(e)(3), concerning the powers and
duties of the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration with
respect to the administration and enforcement of alcoholic beverage laws, is
repealed.
(3) The secretary shall make a biennial report to the Governor
and the General Assembly of his or her activities for the past year, which
shall include statistics as to the amount of vinous (except wines),
spirituous, or malt liquors manufactured in the State of Arkansas and the
disposition thereof; the increase or decrease in their consumption over the
preceding year; the amount of taxes and permit fees collected; and such other
information as he or she deems advisable.

*JLL174*
03/05/2025 9:57:38 AM JLL174